Hawaii statutes.
§10-15.5 REPEALED. L 1990, c
304, §§14, 16.

Note

Act 304, Session Laws of Hawaii 1990, was invalidated by its
own severability clause because amendments made to §§10-2 and 10-13.5 by Act
304 were found to conflict with the federal Forgiveness Act (Pub. L. No.
105-66, §340, 111 Stat. at 1448); thus, §14 of Act 304, codified as §10-15.5,
is repealed.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next